Missouri, session 2026, HB2491.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 215.300, 215.305, 215.307, 215.311, 215.314, 215.316, and
215.327, RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 215.300, 215.305, 215.307, 215.311, 215.314, 215.316, and 215.327, to read as
follows:
215.300. As used in sections 215.300 to 215.318, the following terms mean:
(1) "Additional subsidies", subsidies provided by the Missouri housing development
commission to the owner of a subsidized multifamily rental housing project or senior rental
housing project pursuant to section 215.311;
(2) "Administering agency", the Missouri housing development commission;
(3) "Affordable rent", a rent amount less than or equal to thirty percent of a family's
income;
(4) "Expand affordability", to reduce the cost of the housing to one or more low
income tenants;
(5) "HUD", the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, and
shall include the Federal Housing Administration and a local housing authority when it is
acting to administer a HUD program;
(6) "Low income tenant", a tenant who is a person or group of persons residing in the
same housing accommodation so long as the total income for all such persons for the most
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2491 2
recent twelve-month period is less than or equal to fifty percent of the median income for the
area, as defined by HUD, in accordance with section 1437a, Title 42, United States Code;
(7) "Low income unit", a housing unit for which the annual rental charge is less than
or equal to thirty percent of the maximum annual income for a low income tenant;
(8) "Middle income senior tenant", a tenant who meets the requirements
established in 24 CFR Subpart E or a group of persons residing in the same housing
accommodation headed by a person who meets the requirements established in 24 CFR
Subpart E, so long as the total income for all such persons for the most recent twelve-
month period is more than eighty percent but less than or equal to one hundred twenty-
five percent of the median income for the area, as defined by HUD, in accordance with
Section 1437a, Title 42, U.S.C.;
(9) "Middle income senior unit", a housing unit for which the annual rental
charge is less than or equal to thirty percent of the maximum annual income for a
middle income senior tenant;
(10) "Moderate income tenant", a tenant who is a person or group of persons residing
in the same housing accommodation so long as the total income for all such persons for the
most recent twelve-month period is more than fifty percent but less than or equal to eighty
percent of the median income for the area, as defined by HUD, in accordance with section
1437a, Title 42, United States Code;
[(9)] (11) "Moderate income unit", a housing unit for which the annual rental charge
is less than or equal to thirty percent of the maximum annual income for a moderate income
tenant;
[(10)] (12) "Mortgage prepayment", repayment of outstanding debt on a loan issued
pursuant to a federal mortgage insurance program, prior to the maturity date of the loan;
[(11)] (13) "Multifamily rental housing project", a building or buildings under
common ownership and containing four or more rental units that were constructed or
substantially rehabilitated pursuant to a federal mortgage insurance program;
[(12)] (14) "Prepayment restriction", any limitation imposed by the federal
government with regard to the repayment of outstanding debt on a loan issued pursuant to
a federal mortgage insurance program, prior to the maturity date of the loan, without the prior
approval of the secretary of the Department of Housing and Urban Development;
(15) "Senior rental housing project", a building or buildings under common
ownership and containing four or more rental units that were constructed or
substantially rehabilitated pursuant to a federal mortgage insurance program and are
restricted to tenants who meet the requirements established in 24 CFR Subpart E or a
group of persons residing in the same housing accommodation headed by a person who
meets the requirements established in 24 CFR Subpart E.

HB 2491 3
215.305. The provisions of sections 215.300 to 215.318 shall apply to all multifamily
rental housing projects and senior rental housing projects in any city or town in this state
constructed or substantially rehabilitated pursuant to sections 236 and 221(d)(3) of the
National Housing Act, as amended.
215.307. Any owner of a multifamily housing project or senior rental housing
project subject to the provisions of sections 215.300 to 215.318 which is or will become
eligible for mortgage prepayment without the prior approval of the secretary of the
Department of Housing and Urban Development shall be eligible for additional subsidies
under the provisions of sections 215.300 to 215.318.
215.311. 1. An owner of a multifamily rental housing project or senior rental
housing project seeking additional subsidies for the property shall file with the Missouri
housing development commission a request for subsidies in such form and manner as the
Missouri housing development commission shall prescribe. Upon receipt of a notice of
intent, the Missouri housing development commission shall provide the owner with such
information as the owner needs to prepare a plan to expand affordability, which information
shall include a description of the state incentives authorized under sections 215.300 to
215.318 and the affordability restrictions placed on properties whose owners are granted the
additional subsidies. The owner may submit the plan to expand affordability to the Missouri
housing development commission in such form and manner as the Missouri housing
development commission shall prescribe.
2. The plan to expand affordability shall include:
(1) A description of any incentive that the owner is requesting from the state or local
government agencies as determined by prior consultation between the owner and any
appropriate state or local agencies;
(2) An assessment of the effect of the grant of the proposed incentives on present and
future tenants dwelling at the property, including, but not limited to, affordability and
maintenance of units of the property;
(3) Any other information that the Missouri housing development commission
determines is necessary to achieve the purposes of sections 215.300 to 215.318.
3. The owner may from time to time revise and amend the plan of action as may be
necessary to obtain approval of the plan under this section.
4. After receiving a plan of action from an owner of a multifamily rental housing
project or senior rental housing project, the Missouri housing development commission
may enter into such agreements as are necessary to satisfy the criteria for approval under
section 215.314.

HB 2491 4
5. Such agreements may include the provision to the owner by the state or local
government of one or more of the following incentives that the Missouri housing
development commission determines to be necessary including:
(1) State income tax credits, pursuant to section 32.115;
(2) Recommendations to local governments to grant property tax abatements;
(3) Financing for second mortgages from the housing development fund as
established by section 215.050;
(4) Grants from the housing development fund as established by section 215.050.
215.314. The Missouri housing development commission shall not make additional
subsidies to a multifamily rental housing project or senior rental housing project unless the
owner enters into such agreements with the state or local government agency as are necessary
to assure that:
(1) The housing will be retained as housing affordable for low income families or
persons, [and] moderate income families or persons, and middle income senior-headed
families or seniors for the remaining term of the mortgage or until the term of any subsidy
contract expires or an additional twenty years, whichever is longer, and throughout such
extended period, adequate expenditures shall be made for maintenance and operation of the
housing;
(2) The owner shall not charge or attempt to charge rents in excess of those deemed
affordable to low income families for forty percent of those units becoming available to new
tenants following vacation of a subsidized unit by previous tenants, and the owner shall not
charge or attempt to charge rents in excess of those deemed affordable to moderate income
families for the remaining sixty percent of the subsidized units becoming available following
vacation by previous tenants;
(3) Following any vacation of a moderate or low income unit by its occupants the
owner shall rent the unit to a household that qualifies as a low income household or moderate
income household on its initial occupancy of the unit;
(4) (a) The owner shall not charge or attempt to charge rents at a senior rental
housing project in excess of those deemed affordable to low income families for thirty
percent of units becoming available to new tenants following vacation of a subsidized
unit by previous tenants;
(b) The owner shall not charge or attempt to charge rents in excess of those
deemed affordable to moderate income families for thirty percent of the subsidized units
becoming available following vacation by previous tenants; and
(c) The owner shall not charge or attempt to charge rents in excess of those
deemed affordable to middle income senior tenants for the remaining forty percent of
the subsidized units becoming available following vacation by previous tenants;

HB 2491 5
(5) Following any vacation of a middle income senior unit by its occupants, the
owner shall rent the unit to a tenant who qualifies as a middle income senior tenant on
the tenant's initial occupancy of the unit;
(6) The owner shall not increase rents on additional subsidy units more than one time
every twelve months nor by more than a percentage amount equal to the percentage increase
in the CPI for the preceding year unless the administering agency approves a greater increase
due to extraordinary circumstances;
[(5)] (7) The owner shall seek to retain, renew, extend and utilize, to the greatest
extent feasible, any financing or subsidy arrangements available to the project which would
expand the affordability of the housing;
[(6)] (8) The owner shall not refuse to accept housing vouchers and section 8 existing
housing certificates from tenants in partial payment of rent due;
[(7)] (9) The owner shall not discriminate against any household desiring to rent a
subsidized unit on the basis of the household's receipt of any public assistance payments or
utilization of housing vouchers or section 8 existing housing certificates;
[(8)] (10) Each year following grant of the additional subsidies, no later than sixty
days following the anniversary date of the first grant of additional subsidies, the owner of the
multifamily rental housing project or senior rental housing project shall submit a written
certification to the administering agency on a form provided by the administering agency
which set forth the rent of each additional subsidy unit held by the owner as of the date of the
certification and which certifies to the administering agency that the occupants of each
additional subsidy unit qualified as a low income household or moderate income household
on the date of initial occupancy of the additional subsidy unit by that household;
[(9)] (11) Any tenant residing in a multifamily rental housing project or senior rental
housing project receiving additional subsidies may petition the administering agency for a
downward adjustment of rent, if the tenant is paying rent in excess of thirty percent of his
income.
215.316. Prior to entering agreements to grant additional subsidies to the owner of a
subsidized multifamily rental housing project or senior rental housing project, the Missouri
housing development commission shall consult with the owner, the tenants, the local
government, and HUD and shall hold a public hearing. The Missouri housing development
commission shall give due consideration to any comments submitted by the tenants and the
local government with regards to the expansion of affordability.
215.327. After August 28, 1994, before the commission approves any assistance for
multifamily rental housing or senior rental housing of twelve or more units, the commission
shall notify the chief elected official of the city or, if not within a city, notify the chief elected
official of the county in which proposed site is located, of the request to the commission for

HB 2491 6
assistance for multifamily rental housing or senior rental housing and invite written
comments from the chief elected official of the city or county within thirty days before taking
action on the assistance request.
✔